Vermont, session 2025-2026, S12.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. chapter 230 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 230. EXPUNGEMENT AND SEALING OF CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS
§ 7601. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Court” means the Criminal Division of the Superior Court.
(2) “Criminal history record” means all information documenting an
individual’s contact with the criminal justice system, including data regarding
identification, arrest or citation, arraignment, judicial disposition, custody, and
supervision.
(3) “Predicate offense” means a criminal offense that can be used to
enhance a sentence levied for a later conviction and includes operating a
vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other substance in violation of
23 V.S.A. § 1201, domestic assault in violation of section 1042 of this title,
and stalking in violation of section 1062 of this title. “Predicate offense” shall
not include misdemeanor possession of cannabis, a disorderly conduct offense
under section 1026 of this title, or possession of a controlled substance in
violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4230(a), 4231(a), 4232(a), 4233(a), 4234(a), 4234a(a),
4234b(a), 4235(b), or 4235a(a) “Criminal justice purposes” means the
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 2 of 38
2025
investigation, apprehension, detention, adjudication, or correction of persons
suspected, charged, or convicted of criminal offenses. “Criminal justice
purposes” also includes criminal identification activities; the collection,
storage, and dissemination of criminal history records; and screening for
criminal justice employment.
(4) “Qualifying crime” means:
(A) a misdemeanor offense that is not:
(i) a listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title;
(ii) an offense involving sexual exploitation of children in
violation of chapter 64 of this title;
(iii) an offense involving violation of a protection order in
violation of section 1030 of this title;
(iv) prostitution as defined in section 2632 of this title, or
prohibited conduct under section 2601a of this title; or
(v) a predicate offense;
(B) a violation of subsection 3701(a) of this title related to criminal
mischief;
(C) a violation of section 2501 of this title related to grand larceny;
(D) a violation of section 1201 of this title related to burglary,
excluding any burglary into an occupied dwelling, as defined in subdivision
1201(b)(2) of this title;
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 3 of 38
2025
(E) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4223 related to fraud or deceit;
(F) a violation of section 1802 of this title related to uttering a forged
or counterfeited instrument;
(G) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4230(a) related to possession and
cultivation of cannabis;
(H) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4231(a) related to possession of
cocaine;
(I) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4232(a) related to possession of LSD;
(J) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4233(a) related to possession of heroin;
(K) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4234(a) related to possession of
depressant, stimulant, and narcotic drugs;
(L) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4234a(a) related to possession of
methamphetamine;
(M) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4234b(a) related to possession of
ephedrine and pseudoephedrine;
(N) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4235(b) related to possession of
hallucinogenic drugs;
(O) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4235a(a) related to possession of
ecstasy; or
(P) any offense for which a person has been granted an unconditional
pardon from the Governor.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 4 of 38
2025
(A) all misdemeanor offenses except:
(i) a listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title;
(ii) a violation of chapter 64 of this title relating to sexual
exploitation of children;
(iii) a violation of section 1030 of this title relating to a violation
of an abuse prevention order, an order against stalking or sexual assault, or a
protective order concerning contact with a child;
(iv) a violation of chapter 28 of this title related to abuse, neglect,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult;
(v) a violation of subsection 2605(b) or (c) of this title related to
voyeurism;
(vi) a violation of subdivisions 352(1)–(10) of this title related to
cruelty to animals;
(vii) a violation of section 5409 of this title related to failure to
comply with sex offender registry requirements;
(viii) a violation of section 1455 of this title related to hate
motivated crimes;
(ix) a violation of subsection 1304(a) of this title related to cruelty
to a child;
(x) a violation of section 1305 of this title related to cruelty by
person having custody of another;
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 5 of 38
2025
(xi) a violation of section 1306 of this title related to mistreatment
of persons with impaired cognitive function;
(xii) a violation of section 3151 of this title related to female
genital mutilation;
(xiii) a violation of subsection 3258(b) of this title related to
sexual exploitation of a minor;
(xiv) a violation of subdivision 4058(b)(1) of this title related to
violation of an extreme risk protection order;
(xv) an offense committed in a motor vehicle as defined in 23
V.S.A. § 4 by a person who is the holder of a commercial driver’s license or
commercial driver’s permit pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 39; and
(xvi) any offense that would require registration as a sex offender
pursuant to chapter 167, subchapter 3 of this title; and
(B) the following felonies:
(i) a violation of section 1201 of this title related to burglary,
excluding any burglary into an occupied dwelling, unless the person was
25 years of age or younger at the time of the offense and did not carry a
dangerous or deadly weapon during the commission of the offense;
(ii) designated felony property offenses as defined in subdivision
(5) of this section;
(iii) offenses relating to possessing, cultivating, selling,
dispensing, or transporting regulated drugs, including violations of 18 V.S.A.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 6 of 38
2025
§ 4230(a) and (b), 4231(a) and (b), 4232(a) and (b), 4233(a) and (b), 4233a(a),
4234(a) and (b), 4234a(a) and (b), 4234b(a) and (b), 4235(b) and (c), or
4235a(a) and (b); and
(iv) any offense for which a person has been granted an
unconditional pardon from the Governor.
(5) “Designated felony property offense” means:
(A) section 1801 of this title related to forgery and counterfeiting;
(B) section 1802 of this title related to uttering a forged or
counterfeited instrument;
(C) section 1804 of this title related to counterfeiting paper money;
(D) section 1816 of this title related to possession or use of credit
card skimming devices;
(E) section 2001 of this title related to false personation;
(F) section 2002 of this title related to false pretenses or tokens;
(G) section 2029 of this title related to home improvement fraud;
(H) section 2030 of this title related to identity theft;
(I) section 2501 of this title related to grand larceny;
(J) section 2531 of this title related to embezzlement;
(K) section 2532 of this title related to embezzlement by officers or
servants of an incorporated bank;
(L) section 2533 of this title related to embezzlement by a receiver or
trustee;
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 7 of 38
2025
(M) section 2561 of this title related to receiving stolen property;
(N) section 2575 of this title related to retail theft;
(O) section 2582 of this title related to theft of services;
(P) section 2591 of this title related to theft of rented property;
(Q) section 2592 of this title related to failure to return a rented or
leased motor vehicle;
(R) section 3016 of this title related to false claims;
(S) section 3701 of this title related to unlawful mischief;
(T) section 3705 of this title related to unlawful trespass;
(U) section 3733 of this title related to mills, dams, or bridges;
(V) section 3761 of this title related to unauthorized removal of
human remains;
(W) section 3766 of this title related to grave markers and ornaments;
(X) chapter 87 of this title related to computer crimes; and
(Y) 18 V.S.A. § 4223 related to fraud or deceit in obtaining a
regulated drug.
§ 7602. EXPUNGEMENT AND SEALING OF RECORD,
POSTCONVICTION; PROCEDURE
(a)(1) A person may file a petition with the court requesting expungement
or sealing of the criminal history record related to the conviction if:
(A) the person was convicted of a qualifying crime or qualifying
crimes arising out of the same incident or occurrence;
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 8 of 38
2025
(B) the person was convicted of an offense for which the underlying
conduct is no longer prohibited by law or designated as a criminal offense;
(C) pursuant to the conditions set forth in subsection (g) of this
section, the person was convicted of a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201(a) or
§ 1091 related to operating under the influence of alcohol or other substance,
excluding a violation of those sections resulting in serious bodily injury or
death to any person other than the operator, or related to operating a school bus
with a blood alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more or operating a commercial
vehicle with a blood alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more; or
(D) pursuant to the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of this
section, the person was convicted under 1201(c)(3)(A) of a violation of
subdivision 1201(a) of this title related to burglary when the person was
25 years of age or younger, and the person did not carry a dangerous or deadly
weapon during commission of the offense.
(2) The State’s Attorney or Attorney General shall be the respondent in
the matter.
(3) The court shall grant the petition without hearing if the petitioner
and the respondent stipulate to the granting of the petition. The respondent
shall file the stipulation with the court, and the court shall issue the petitioner
an order of expungement and provide notice of the order in accordance with
this section.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 9 of 38
2025
(4) This section shall not apply to an individual licensed as a
commercial driver pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 39 seeking to seal or expunge
a record of a conviction for a felony offense committed in a motor vehicle as
defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4.
(b)(1) The court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history
record be expunged pursuant to section 7606 of this title if the following
conditions are met:
(A) At least five years have elapsed since the date on which the
person successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
conviction, or if the person has successfully completed the terms and
conditions of an indeterminate term of probation that commenced at least five
years previously.
(B) The person has not been convicted of a crime arising out of a new
incident or occurrence since the person was convicted for the qualifying crime.
(C) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court have been
paid in full, provided that payment of surcharges shall not be required if the
surcharges have been waived by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(D) The court finds that expungement of the criminal history record
serves the interests of justice.
(2) The court shall grant the petition and order that all or part of the
criminal history record be sealed pursuant to section 7607 of this title if the
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 10 of 38
2025
conditions of subdivisions (1)(A), (B), and (C) of this subsection are met and
the court finds that:
(A) sealing the criminal history record better serves the interests of
justice than expungement; and
(B) the person committed the qualifying crime after reaching 19
years of age.
(c)(1) The court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history
record be expunged pursuant to section 7606 of this title if the following
conditions are met:
(A) At least 10 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
conviction.
(B) The person has not been convicted of a felony arising out of a
new incident or occurrence in the last seven years.
(C) The person has not been convicted of a misdemeanor during the
past five years.
(D) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime
of which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 11 of 38
2025
(E) After considering the particular nature of any subsequent offense,
the court finds that expungement of the criminal history record for the
qualifying crime serves the interests of justice.
(2) The court shall grant the petition and order that all or part of the
criminal history record be sealed pursuant to section 7607 of this title if the
conditions of subdivisions (1)(A), (B), (C), and (D) of this subsection are met
and the court finds that:
(A) sealing the criminal history record better serves the interests of
justice than expungement; and
(B) the person committed the qualifying crime after reaching 19
years of age.
(d) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section,
unless the court finds that expungement would not be in the interests of justice,
the court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history record be
expunged in accordance with section 7606 of this title if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The petitioner has completed any sentence or supervision for the
offense.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court have been paid
in full, provided that payment of surcharges shall not be required if the
surcharges have been waived by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 12 of 38
2025
(e) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section for a
conviction for possession of a regulated drug under 18 V.S.A. chapter 84,
subchapter 1 in an amount that is no longer prohibited by law or for which
criminal sanctions have been removed:
(1) The petitioner shall bear the burden of establishing that his or her
conviction was based on possessing an amount of regulated drug that is no
longer prohibited by law or for which criminal sanctions have been removed.
(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the amount of the
regulated drug specified in the affidavit of probable cause associated with the
petitioner’s conviction was the amount possessed by the petitioner.
(f) Prior to granting an expungement or sealing under this section for
petitions filed pursuant to subdivision 7601(4)(D) of this title, the court shall
make a finding that the conduct underlying the conviction under section 1201
of this title did not constitute a burglary into an occupied dwelling, as defined
in subdivision 1201(b)(2) of this title. The petitioner shall bear the burden of
establishing this fact.
(g) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section, only
petitions to seal may be considered or granted by the court. This subsection
shall not apply to an individual licensed as a commercial driver pursuant to
23 V.S.A. chapter 39. Unless the court finds that sealing would not be in the
interests of justice, the court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 13 of 38
2025
history record be sealed in accordance with section 7607 of this title if the
following conditions are met:
(1) At least 10 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
conviction, or if the person has successfully completed the terms and
conditions of an indeterminate term of probation that commenced at least
10 years previously.
(2) At the time of the filing of the petition:
(A) the person has only one conviction of a violation of 23 V.S.A.
§ 1201, which shall be construed in accordance with 23 V.S.A. § 1211; and
(B) the person has not been convicted of a crime arising out of a new
incident or occurrence since the person was convicted of a violation of
23 V.S.A. § 1201(a).
(3) Any restitution ordered by the court has been paid in full.
(4) The court finds that sealing of the criminal history record serves the
interests of justice.
(h) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section,
unless the court finds that expungement or sealing would not be in the interests
of justice, the court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history
record be expunged or sealed in accordance with section 7606 or 7607 of this
title if the following conditions are met:
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 14 of 38
2025
(1) At least 15 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
conviction, or the person has successfully completed the terms and conditions
of an indeterminate term of probation that commenced at least 15 years
previously.
(2) The person has not been convicted of a crime arising out of a new
incident or occurrence since the person was convicted of a violation of
subdivision 1201(c)(3)(A) of this title.
(3) Any restitution ordered by the court has been paid in full.
(4) The court finds that expungement or sealing of the criminal history
record serves the interests of justice.
(a) Petition.
(1) A person may file a petition with the court requesting expungement
of a criminal history record related to a conviction if the person was convicted
of an offense for which the underlying conduct is no longer prohibited by law
or designated as a criminal offense.
(2) A person may file a petition with the court requesting sealing of a
criminal history record related to a conviction if the person was convicted of a
qualifying crime or qualifying crimes arising out of the same incident or
occurrence.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 15 of 38
2025
(3) Whichever office prosecuted the offense resulting in the conviction,
the State’s Attorney or Attorney General, shall be the respondent in the matter
unless the prosecuting office authorizes the other to act as the respondent.
(4) The court shall grant the petition without hearing if the petitioner
and the respondent stipulate to the granting of the petition. The respondent
shall file the stipulation with the court, and the court shall issue the petitioner
an order of sealing and provide notice of the order to all Vermont State entities
provided by the petitioner and all entities required to receive notice pursuant to
subsection 7607(a) of this title.
(5) This section shall not apply to an individual who is the holder of a
commercial driver’s license or commercial driver’s permit pursuant to 23
V.S.A. chapter 39 seeking to seal a record of a conviction for a misdemeanor
or felony offense committed in a motor vehicle as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4.
(b) Offenses that are no longer prohibited by law. For petitions filed
pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the court shall grant the petition
and order that the criminal history record be expunged if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The petitioner has completed any sentence or supervision for the
offense.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court have been paid
in full, provided that payment of surcharges shall not be required if the
surcharges have been waived by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 16 of 38
2025
(c) Qualifying misdemeanors. For petitions filed to seal a qualifying
misdemeanor pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the court shall
grant the petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if the
following conditions are met:
(1) At least three years have elapsed since the date on which the person
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime of
which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(3) The respondent has failed to show that sealing would be contrary to
the interests of justice.
(d) Qualifying felony offenses. For petitions filed to seal a qualifying
felony pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the court shall grant the
petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if the following
conditions are met:
(1) At least seven years have elapsed since the date on which the person
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime of
which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 17 of 38
2025
(3) The respondent has failed to show that sealing would be contrary to
the interests of justice.
(e) Qualifying DUI misdemeanor. For petitions filed to seal a qualifying
DUI misdemeanor pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the court shall
grant the petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if the
following conditions are met:
(1) At least 10 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime of
which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(3) The person is not the holder of a commercial driver’s license or
commercial driver’s permit pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 39.
(4) The respondent has failed to show that sealing would be contrary to
the interests of justice.
(f) Fish and wildlife offenses. Sealing a criminal history record related to a
fish and wildlife offense shall not void any fish and wildlife license suspension
or revocation imposed pursuant to the accumulation of points related to the
sealed offense. Points accumulated by a person shall remain on the person’s
license and, if applicable, completion of the remedial course shall be required
as set forth in 10 V.S.A. § 4502.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 18 of 38
2025
§ 7603. EXPUNGEMENT AND SEALING OF RECORD, NO
CONVICTION; PROCEDURE
(a) Unless either party objects in the interests of justice, the court shall
issue an order sealing the criminal history record related to the citation or arrest
of a person:
(1) within 60 days after the final disposition of the case if:
(A) the court does not make a determination of probable cause at the
time of arraignment; or
(B) the charge is dismissed before trial with or without prejudice; or
(C) the defendant is acquitted of the charges; or
(2) at any time if the prosecuting attorney and the defendant stipulate
that the court may grant the petition to seal the record.
(b) If a party objects to sealing or expunging a record pursuant to this
section, the court shall schedule a hearing to determine if sealing or expunging
the record serves the interests of justice. The defendant and the prosecuting
attorney shall be the only parties in the matter.
(c), (d) [Repealed.]
(e) Unless either party objects in the interests of justice, the court shall
issue an order expunging a criminal history record related to the citation or
arrest of a person:
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 19 of 38
2025
(1) within 60 days after the final disposition of the case if:
(A) the defendant is acquitted of the charges; or
(B) the charge is dismissed with prejudice;
(2) at any time if the prosecuting attorney and the defendant stipulate
that the court may grant the petition to expunge the record. [Repealed.]
(f) Unless either party objects in the interests of justice, the court shall issue
an order to expunge a record sealed pursuant to subsection (a) or (g) of this
section eight years after the date on which the record was sealed. [Repealed.]
(g) A person may file a petition with the court requesting sealing or
expungement of a criminal history record related to the citation or arrest of the
person at any time. The court shall grant the petition and issue an order sealing
or expunging the record if it finds that sealing or expunging the record serves
the interests of justice, or if the parties stipulate to sealing or expungement of
the record.
(h) The court may expunge any records that were sealed pursuant to this
section prior to July 1, 2018 unless the State’s Attorney’s office that
prosecuted the case objects. Thirty days prior to expunging a record pursuant
to this subsection, the court shall provide to the State’s Attorney’s office that
prosecuted the case written notice of its intent to expunge the record.
[Repealed.]
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 20 of 38
2025
§ 7604. NEW CHARGE
If a person is charged with a criminal offense after he or she has filed a
petition for expungement pursuant to this chapter has a criminal charge
pending at the time the petition for sealing or expungement is before the court,
the court shall not act on the petition until disposition of the new charge.
§ 7605. DENIAL OF PETITION
If a petition for expungement or sealing is denied by the court pursuant to
this chapter, no further petition shall be brought for at least two years, unless a
shorter duration is authorized by the court.
§ 7606. EFFECT OF EXPUNGEMENT
(a) Order and notice. Upon finding that the requirements for expungement
have been met, the court shall issue an order that shall include provisions that
its effect is to annul the record of the arrest, conviction, and sentence and that
such person shall be treated in all respects as if the person had never been
arrested, convicted, or sentenced for the offense. The court shall provide
notice of the expungement to the respondent, Vermont Crime Information
Center (VCIC), the arresting agency, the Restitution Unit of the Vermont
Center for Crime Victim Services, and any other entity that may have a record
related to the order to expunge. The VCIC shall provide notice of the
expungement to the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s National Crime
Information Center.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 21 of 38
2025
(b) Effect.
(1) Upon entry of an expungement order, the order shall be legally
effective immediately and the person whose record is expunged shall be treated
in all respects as if he or she the person had never been arrested, convicted, or
sentenced for the offense.
(2) In any application for employment, license, or civil right or privilege
or in an appearance as a witness in any proceeding or hearing, a person may be
required to answer questions about a previous criminal history record only with
respect to arrests or convictions that have not been expunged. A State entity
that inquires about a person’s criminal history record shall advise the person of
the person’s right not to disclose expunged records pursuant to this
subdivision.
(3) The response to an inquiry from any person regarding an expunged
record shall be that “NO CRIMINAL RECORD EXISTS.”
(4) Nothing in this section shall affect any right of the person whose
record has been expunged to rely on it as a bar to any subsequent proceedings
for the same offense.
(c) Process.
(1) The court shall remove the expunged offense from any accessible
database that it maintains.
(2) Until all charges on a docket are expunged, the case file shall remain
publicly accessible.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 22 of 38
2025
(3) When all charges on a docket have been expunged, the case file shall
be destroyed pursuant to policies established by the Court Administrator.
(d) Special index.
(1) The court shall keep a special index of cases that have been
expunged together with the expungement order. The index shall list only the
name of the person convicted of the offense, his or her the person’s date of
birth, the docket number, and the criminal offense that was the subject of the
expungement.
(2) The special index and related documents specified in subdivision (1)
of this subsection shall be confidential and shall be physically and
electronically segregated in a manner that ensures confidentiality and that
limits access to authorized persons.
(3) Inspection of the expungement order may be permitted only upon
petition by the person who is the subject of the case. The Chief Superior Judge
may permit special access to the index and the documents for research
purposes pursuant to the rules for public access to court records.
(4) [Repealed]. [Repealed.]
(5) The Court Administrator shall establish policies for implementing
this subsection.
§ 7607. EFFECT OF SEALING
(a) Order and notice. Upon entry of an order to seal, the order shall be
legally effective immediately and the person whose record is sealed shall be
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 23 of 38
2025
treated in all respects as if the person had never been arrested, convicted, or
sentenced for the offense and that its effect is to annul the record of arrest,
conviction, and sentence. The court shall provide notice of the sealing to the
respondent, Vermont Crime Information Center (VCIC), the arresting agency,
the Restitution Unit of the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services, and any
other entity that may have a record related to the order to seal. The VCIC shall
provide notice of the sealing to the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s National
Crime Information Center send a copy of any order sealing a criminal history
record to all of the parties and attorneys representing the parties, including to
the prosecuting agency that prosecuted the offense, the Vermont Crime
Information Center (VCIC), the arresting agency, and any other Vermont State
entity identified by the petitioner that may have a record subject to the sealing
order. VCIC shall provide notice of the sealing order to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation’s National Crime Information Center.
(b) Effect.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision subsection (c) of this section,
upon entry of a sealing order, the order shall be legally effective immediately
and the person whose record is sealed shall be treated in all respects as if he or
she the person had never been arrested, convicted, or sentenced for the offense.
(2) In any application for employment, license, or civil right or privilege
or in an appearance as a witness in any proceeding or hearing, a person may be
required to answer questions about a previous criminal history record only with
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 24 of 38
2025
respect to arrests or convictions that have not been sealed. A State entity that
inquires about a person’s criminal history record shall advise the person of the
person’s right not to disclose sealed records pursuant to this subdivision.
(3) The response to an inquiry from any member of the public regarding
a sealed record shall be that “NO CRIMINAL RECORD EXISTS.”
(4) Nothing in this section shall affect any right of the person whose
record has been sealed to rely on it as a bar to any subsequent proceeding for
the same offense.
(c) Exceptions. A party seeking to use a sealed criminal history record,
pursuant to the exceptions established in this subsection, in a court proceeding
shall, prior to any use of or reference to the record in open court or in a public
filing, notify the court of the party’s intent to do so. The court shall thereafter
determine whether the record may be used prior to its disclosure in the
proceeding. If a party submits a filing that contains a sealed record or a
reference to a sealed record, that filing shall be filed under seal and remain
under seal unless the court permits the use of the sealed record. This shall not
apply to the use of a sealed record pursuant to subdivision (8) of this
subsection. Use of a sealed record pursuant to an exception shall not change
the effect of sealing under subsection (b) of this section. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law or a sealing order:
(1) An entity or person that possesses a sealed record, or an attorney for
such entity or person, may continue to use it the record for any litigation or
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 25 of 38
2025
claim arising out of the same incident or occurrence or involving the same
defendant, including use of the record in reasonable anticipation of litigation.
The entity or person shall, before disclosing the record to another person,
provide the following notice to the recipient of the record: “SEALED -
KNOWINGLY ACCESSING OR DISCLOSING THIS RECORD WITHOUT
AUTHORIZATION IS A CIVIL VIOLATION SUBJECT TO A PENALTY
OF NOT MORE THAN $1,000.00.”
(2)(A) A Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (2), a
criminal justice agency as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2056a and the Attorney
General may use the criminal history record sealed in accordance with section
7602 or 7603 of this title without limitation for criminal justice purposes as
defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2056a section 7601 of this title.
(B)(i) A criminal justice agency or the Attorney General may
disclose a sealed criminal history record to another person only pursuant to a
court order issued after the agency or the Attorney General files a petition and
a supporting affidavit. The court shall permit disclosure of the record if it finds
that disclosure is for criminal justice purposes as defined in section 7601 of
this title. The court may grant the petition ex parte or upon hearing at the
court’s discretion. The agency or the Attorney General shall provide the
following notice to the recipient of the record: “SEALED - KNOWINGLY
ACCESSING OR DISCLOSING THIS RECORD WITHOUT
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 26 of 38
2025
AUTHORIZATION IS A CIVIL VIOLATION SUBJECT TO A PENALTY
OF NOT MORE THAN $1,000.00.”
(ii) This subdivision (B) shall not require a criminal justice agency
or the Attorney General to petition or obtain a court order for disclosure of
records:
(I) to another criminal justice agency; or
(II) to meet discovery obligations pursuant to subdivision (7) of
this subsection (c).
(3) A defendant may use the sealed criminal history record of another
person in the defendant’s criminal proceeding. The defendant shall, before
disclosing the record to another person, provide the following notice to the
recipient of the record: “SEALED - KNOWINGLY ACCESSING OR
DISCLOSING THIS RECORD WITHOUT AUTHORIZATION IS A CIVIL
VIOLATION SUBJECT TO A PENALTY OF NOT MORE THAN
$1,000.00.”
(4) A sealed record of a prior violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201(a) shall be
admissible as a predicate offense for the purpose of imposing an enhanced
penalty for a subsequent violation of that section, in accordance with the
provisions of 23 V.S.A. § 1210.
(5) A person or a court in possession of an order issued by a court
regarding a matter that was subsequently sealed may file or cite to that decision
in any subsequent proceeding. The party or court filing or citing to that
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 27 of 38
2025
decision shall ensure that information regarding the identity of the defendant in
the sealed record is redacted.
(6) The Vermont Crime Information Center and Criminal Justice
Information Services Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall
have access to sealed criminal history records without limitation for the
purpose of responding to queries to the National Instant Criminal Background
Check System regarding firearms transfers and attempted transfers.
(7) The State’s Attorney, the Attorney General, the person who is the
subject of a sealed record, and the attorney for the person who is the subject of
the record shall disclose information contained in a sealed criminal history
record when required to meet discovery obligations.
(8) The person whose criminal history records have been sealed
pursuant to this chapter and the person’s attorney may access and use the
sealed records.
(9) A law enforcement agency may inspect and receive copies of the
sealed criminal history records of any applicant who applies to the agency to
be a law enforcement officer or a current employee for the purpose of internal
investigation.
(10) Persons or entities conducting research shall have access to a sealed
criminal history record to carry out research pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2056b.
(11) Information and materials gathered by the Department for Children
and Families during a joint investigation with law enforcement, including law
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 28 of 38
2025
enforcement affidavits and related references to such information and
materials, are not criminal history records as defined in subdivision 7601(2) of
this title and are considered Department records that shall be maintained and
may be utilized as statutorily prescribed by 33 V.S.A. chapter 49 and produced
in response to a court order.
(12) Information and materials gathered by Adult Protective Services
during a joint investigation with law enforcement, including law enforcement
affidavits and other investigative materials, are not criminal history records as
defined in subdivision 7601(2) of this title and are considered records of the
Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, which shall be
maintained and may be utilized as authorized by 33 V.S.A. chapter 69 and
produced in response to a court order.
(d) Process.
(1) The court shall bar viewing of the sealed offense in any accessible
database that it maintains.
(2) Until all charges on a docket have been sealed, the case file shall
remain publicly accessible.
(3) When all charges on a docket have been sealed, the case file shall
become exempt from public access.
(4) When a sealing order is issued by the court, any person or entity,
except the court, that possesses criminal history records and has been provided
notice of the order shall:
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 29 of 38
2025
(A) bar viewing of the sealed offense in any accessible database that
it maintains or remove information pertaining to the sealed records from any
publicly accessible database that the person or entity maintains; and
(B) clearly label the criminal history record as “SEALED” to ensure
compliance with this section.
(e) Special index.
(1) The court shall keep a special index of cases that have been sealed
together with the sealing order. The index shall list only the name of the
person convicted of the offense, his or her the person’s date of birth, the docket
number, and the criminal offense that was the subject of the sealing.
(2) The special index and related documents specified in subdivision (1)
of this subsection shall be confidential and shall be physically and
electronically segregated in a manner that ensures confidentiality and that
limits access to authorized persons.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, inspection of the
sealing order may be permitted only upon petition by the person who is the
subject of the case. The Chief Superior Judge may permit special access to the
index and the documents for research purposes pursuant to the rules for public
access to court records.
(4) The Court Administrator shall establish policies for implementing
this subsection.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 30 of 38
2025
(f) Victims Compensation Program. Upon request, the Victim’s Victims
Compensation Program shall be provided with a copy, redacted of all
information identifying the offender, of the affidavit for the sole purpose of
verifying the expenses in a victim’s compensation application submitted
pursuant to section 5353 of this title.
(g) Restitution. The sealing of a criminal record shall not affect the
authority of the Restitution Unit to enforce a restitution order in the same
manner as a civil judgment pursuant to subdivision 5362(c)(2) of this title.
§ 7608. VICTIMS
(a) At the time a petition is filed pursuant to this chapter, the respondent
shall give notice of the petition to any victim of the offense who is known to
the respondent. The victim shall have the right to offer the respondent a
statement prior to any stipulation or to offer the court a statement. The
disposition of the petition shall not be unnecessarily delayed pending receipt of
a victim’s statement. The respondent’s inability to locate a victim after a
reasonable effort has been made shall not be a bar to granting a petition.
(b) As used in this section, “reasonable effort” means attempting to contact
the victim by first-class mail at the victim’s last known address and, by
telephone at the victim’s last known phone number, and by email at the
victim’s last known email address.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 31 of 38
2025
§ 7609. EXPUNGEMENT OF SEALING CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
OF AN INDIVIDUAL A PERSON 18–21 YEARS OF AGE
(a) Procedure Petition. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section,
the record of the criminal proceedings for an individual who was 18–21 years
of age at the time the individual committed a qualifying crime shall be
expunged within 30 days after the date on which the individual successfully
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the conviction of the
qualifying crime, absent a finding of good cause by the court. The court shall
issue an order to expunge all records and files related to the arrest, citation,
investigation, charge, adjudication of guilt, criminal proceedings, and
probation related to the sentence. A copy of the order shall be sent to each
agency, department, or official named in the order. Thereafter, the court, law
enforcement officers, agencies, and departments shall reply to any request for
information that no record exists with respect to such individual.
Notwithstanding this subsection, the record shall not be expunged until
restitution and surcharges have been paid in full, provided that payment of
surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived by the
court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who was 18–
21 years of age at the time the person committed a qualifying crime may file a
petition with the court requesting sealing of the criminal history record related
to the qualifying crime after 30 days have elapsed since the person completed
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 32 of 38
2025
the terms and conditions for the sentence for the qualifying crime. The court
shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if
the following conditions are met:
(A) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime
of which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(B) The respondent has failed to show that sealing would be contrary
to the interests of justice.
(2) Order, notice, and effect of sealing shall comply with the provisions
of subsections 7607(a) and (b) of this title.
(b) Exceptions.
(1) A criminal history record that includes both qualifying and
nonqualifying offenses shall not be eligible for expungement sealing pursuant
to this section.
(2) The Vermont Crime Information Center shall retain a special index
of sentences for sex offenses that require registration pursuant to chapter 167,
subchapter 3 of this title. This index shall only list the name and date of birth
of the subject of the expunged files and records, the offense for which the
subject was convicted, and the docket number of the proceeding that was the
subject of the expungement. The special index shall be confidential and shall
be accessed only by the Director of the Vermont Crime Information Center and
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 33 of 38
2025
an individual designated for the purpose of providing information to the
Department of Corrections in the preparation of a presentence investigation in
accordance with 28 V.S.A. §§ 204 and 204a. [Repealed.]
(c) Petitions. An individual who was 18–21 years of age at the time the
individual committed a qualifying crime may file a petition with the court
requesting expungement of the criminal history record related to the qualifying
crime after 30 days have elapsed since the individual completed the terms and
conditions for the sentence for the qualifying crime. The court shall grant the
petition and issue an order sealing or expunging the record if it finds that
sealing or expunging the record serves the interests of justice. [Repealed.]
§ 7610. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD SEALING SPECIAL FUND
There is established the Criminal History Record Sealing Special Fund,
which shall be managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.
Fees collected pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1431(e) for the filing of a petition to
seal a criminal history record of a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201(a) shall be
deposited into and credited to this Fund. This Fund shall be available to the
Office of the Court Administrator, the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs, the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the Vermont Crime
Information Center to offset the administrative costs of sealing such records.
Balances in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be carried forward and
remain in the Fund.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 34 of 38
2025
§ 7611. UNAUTHORIZED DISCLOSURE
A State or municipal employee or contractor or any agent of the court,
including an attorney and an employee or contractor of the attorney, person
who knowingly accesses or discloses sealed criminal history record
information without authorization shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more
than $1,000.00. Each unauthorized disclosure shall constitute a separate civil
violation.
Sec. 2. RIGHT TO NOT DISCLOSE EXPUNGED OR SEALED
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
(a) The Secretary of Administration shall notify all State administrative
entities of the obligation to notify persons of the right not to disclose an
expunged record pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 7606(b)(2) or a sealed record
pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 7607(b)(2).
(b) The Court Administrator shall notify the Judicial Branch of the
obligation to notify persons of the right not to disclose an expunged record
pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 7606(b)(2) or a sealed record pursuant to 13 V.S.A.
§ 7607(b)(2).
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 2296b is added to read:
§ 2296b. EXPUNGEMENT OF MUNICIPAL VIOLATION RECORDS
(a) Expungement. Two years following the satisfaction of a judgment
resulting from an adjudication of a municipal violation, the Judicial Bureau
shall make an entry of “expunged” and notify the municipality of such action,
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 35 of 38
2025
provided the person has not been adjudicated for any subsequent municipal
violations during that time. The data transfer to the municipality shall include
the name, date of birth, ticket number, and offense. Violations of offenses
adopted pursuant to chapter 117 of this title shall not be eligible for
expungement under this section.
(b) Effect of expungement.
(1) Upon entry of an expungement order, the order shall be legally
effective immediately and the individual whose record is expunged shall be
treated in all respects as if the individual had never been adjudicated of the
violation.
(2) Upon an entry of expunged, the case will be accessible only by the
Clerk of the Court for the Judicial Bureau or the Clerk’s designee.
Adjudications that have been expunged shall not appear in the results of any
Judicial Bureau database search by name, date of birth, or any other data
identifying the defendant. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section,
any documents or other records related to an expunged adjudication that are
maintained outside the Judicial Bureau’s case management system shall be
destroyed.
(3) Upon receiving an inquiry from any person regarding an expunged
record, the Judicial Bureau and the municipality shall respond that “NO
RECORD EXISTS.”
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 36 of 38
2025
(c) Exception for research entities. Research entities that maintain
adjudication records for purposes of collecting, analyzing, and disseminating
criminal justice data shall not be subject to the expungement requirements
established in this section. Research entities shall abide by the policies
established by the Court Administrator and shall not disclose any identifying
information from the records they maintain.
(d) Policies for implementation. The Court Administrator shall establish
policies for implementing this section.
(e) Application. This section shall apply to municipal violations that occur
on and after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. § 2303 is amended to read:
§ 2303. EXPUNGEMENT OF VIOLATION RECORDS
* * *
(e) Application. This section shall apply to motor vehicle violations that
occur on and after July 1, 2021.
Sec. 5. 20 V.S.A. § 2372 is added to read:
§ 2372. STATEWIDE MODEL POLICY; USE OF SEALED CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS BY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Criminal history records” has the same meaning as in section 2056a
of this title.
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 37 of 38
2025
(2) “Criminal justice purposes” has the same meaning as in section
2056a of this title.
(3) “Law enforcement agency” has the same meaning as in section
2351a of this title.
(b) On or before December 15, 2025, the Vermont Criminal Justice
Council shall establish a statewide model policy governing the access and use
of sealed criminal history records by Vermont law enforcement agencies. The
purpose of the policy is to ensure consistent statewide application of law and
practice regarding the access and use of sealed criminal history information for
criminal justice purposes under 13 V.S.A. chapter 230, balancing the
confidentiality of this information with legitimate criminal justice purposes. If
a law enforcement agency or officer was required to adopt a policy pursuant to
this subsection but failed to do so on or before March 15, 2026, that agency or
officer shall be deemed to have adopted, and shall follow and enforce, the
model policy established by the Criminal Justice Council. The policy shall
govern the access and use of sealed criminal history records by all law
enforcement officers in the State and shall include the following provisions
consistent with 13 V.S.A. chapter 230:
(1) define the types of sealed criminal history records that may be
accessed and used, including sealed criminal history records contained in
records of arrests and prosecutions, and sealed criminal history records
contained in computer-aided dispatch and record management systems;
VT LEG #384277 v.1

No. 60 Page 38 of 38
2025
(2) define a record-keeping system through which the law enforcement
agency maintains records of each instance in which an officer has accessed or
used a sealed criminal history record; and
(3) comply with applicable State and federal law.
(c) The Criminal Justice Council shall:
(1) adopt rules to ensure that the policies and standards of this section
are met; and
(2) develop, publish, and periodically review the statewide model policy
established pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: June 12, 2025
VT LEG #384277 v.1